North Dakota, session 69, SB2250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 32-03-30 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
32-03-30. Damages for wrongful injuries to timber.
1. For wrongfulwillful and wanton injuries to timber, trees, or underwood upon the land of
another, or removal thereof, the measure of damages is three times such a sum as would
compensate for the actual detriment, except when the trespass was casual and involuntary or
committed under the belief that the land belonged to the trespasser, or when the wood was
taken by the authority of highway officers for the purposes of a highway. In such a case the.
2. For negligent injuries to timber, trees, or underwood upon the land of another, or removal
thereof, the measure of damages areis a sum equal to the actual detriment.

S. B. NO. 2250 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2250.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 84 Nays 8 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State